Utah statutes.
63G-12-103.   Immigration Act Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Immigration Act Restricted Account."

(2) (a)  The restricted account shall consist of:

(i)  a fee collected under this chapter;

(ii)  a fine collected under Section 63G-12-207;

(iii)  civil penalties imposed under Section 63G-12-211 or 63G-12-306;

(iv)  money appropriated to the restricted account by the Legislature; and

(v)  interest earned on the restricted account.

(b)  The restricted account shall earn interest.

(3)  The Legislature may appropriate money from the restricted account to:

(a)  the department and the Office of the Governor to pay the costs associated with the implementation of Section 63G-12-202;

(b)  the department to administer this chapter;

(c)  the State Tax Commission for costs associated with implementing Section 63G-12-203;

(d)  the attorney general for costs associated with:

(i)  litigation related to this chapter;

(ii)  a multi-agency strike force created under Section 67-5-22.7; or

(iii)  a memorandum of understanding executed under Section 67-5-28; and

(e)  the Identity Theft Restricted Account created in Section 67-5-22.7.

